New Jersey, session 221, S547.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.1966, c.214 (C.52:16A-27) is amended to read as follows: 3.    (a)  The council shall employ an executive director and such other personnel  as may be deemed necessary to accomplish its objectives within the limit of  funds available therefor. (b)   The members of the council shall elect annually a chairman and a vice chairman from their number. The executive director shall serve as secretary of  the council.  The chairman shall be the chief executive officer of the council.   The chairman shall preside at all meetings of the council and shall perform  such other duties as shall be prescribed by the council.  The executive  director shall carry out the policies of the council under the direction of the  chairman. (c)   The council shall adopt rules and regulations concerning the operation of the council, the functions and responsibilities of its officers and employees and such other matters as may be necessary to carry out the purpose of this act. (d)   The council shall be authorized and empowered to hold public and private  hearings, and, within the limit of funds available therefor, to enter into  contracts with individuals, organizations, and institutions for services or  endeavors furthering the objectives of the council's programs; to accept gifts, grants and bequests of funds from individuals, foundations, corporations, governmental agencies, and other organizations or institutions; to make and sign any agreements and to do and perform any acts that may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this act.  The council may request and shall receive from any department or agency of the State Government such assistance, information, and advice as will enable it to carry out its powers and duties hereunder. (e)   The council shall make an annual report to the Governor and the Legislature concerning the status of the arts in New Jersey and such other matters as the council deems desirable. (f)   An entity that receives a grant from the council for any purpose shall not schedule, within the 12-month period following the receipt of the grant, any educational course, class, or lecture that is made available to the public for those days on which the schools in the school district, in which the course, class, or lecture is held, are closed for a religious holiday.  This subsection shall apply to any course, class, or lecture that requires in-person attendance or that is held on-line.  If a course, class, or lecture is held on-line, it shall not be held on the days that the schools in the school district in which the entity is located are closed for a religious holiday.  This subsection shall apply to a course, class, or lecture for which the public is charged a fee or that is offered free of charge. (cf: P.L.1966, c.214, s.3) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.